Utah statutes.
65A-8a-106.   Division to provide technical assistance -- Administrative
rules.
(1)  The division may provide:
(a)  advice and technical assistance to landowners and operators by:
(i)  developing forest stewardship plans;
(ii)  developing harvest or forest management plans; and
(iii)  developing programs and activities promoting stewardship of forest and
other lands;
(b)  information about tax incentives or other financial incentives designed
to enhance the productive potential of forested land; or
(c)  federal cost-share incentives to eligible nonindustrial, private forest
landowners, if available.
(2)  The division, in cooperation with Utah State University Extension
Services, shall:
(a)  develop and implement a public education and awareness program to inform
citizens about the benefits of long-term stewardship of forest and other
lands; and
(b)  provide technical assistance to landowners in developing management plans
that may be required for financial incentive programs.
(3)  The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, governing the application, approval,
implementation, and monitoring of a forest stewardship plan.
